Utah statutes.
48-2a-207 (Repealed 07/01/13).   Liability for false statement in certificate.

If any certificate of limited partnership or certificate of amendment or cancellation contains a false statement, one who suffers loss by reasonable reliance on the statement may recover damages for the loss from:

(1)  any person who executed the certificate, whether in his own name or on behalf of another as attorney-in-fact, who knew, or reasonably should have known, that the statement was false at the time the certificate was executed; and

(2)  any general partner who at any time knew, or reasonably should have known, that the statement was false at the time the certificate was executed or knew or reasonably should have known that any arrangement or other fact described in the certificate had changed, making the statement inaccurate in any respect, if that general partner failed to cancel or amend the certificate, or to file a petition for its cancellation or amendment under Section 48-2a-202 or 48-2a-203, within 30 days of the date on which the general partner knew, or reasonably should have known, that the statement was false or that the change had occurred.

